Wisconsin, session 2025, SB166.
do enact as follows:SB166,11Section 1. 100.80 of the statutes is created to read:SB166,2,22100.80 Consumer data protection. (1) Definitions. In this section:SB166,2,93(a) “Affiliate” means a legal entity that controls, is controlled by, or is under 4common control with another legal entity or shares common branding with another 5legal entity. For the purposes of this definition, “control” or “controlled” means 6ownership of, or the power to vote, more than 50 percent of the outstanding shares 7of any class of voting security of a company; control in any manner over the election 8of a majority of the directors or of individuals exercising similar functions; or the 9power to exercise controlling influence over the management of a company.SB166,3,210(b) “Authenticate” means verifying through reasonable means that the 11consumer, entitled to exercise his or her consumer rights under sub. (2), is the same 1consumer exercising such consumer rights, or is an individual with authority to 2exercise such rights of a consumer, with respect to the personal data at issue.SB166,3,103(c) “Biometric data” means data generated by automatic measurements of an 4individual’s biological characteristics, such as a fingerprint, voiceprint, eye retinas, 5irises, or other unique biological patterns or characteristics that are used to identify 6a specific individual. “Biometric data” does not include a physical or digital 7photograph, a video or audio recording or data generated therefrom unless such 8data is generated to identify a specific individual, or information collected, used, or 9stored for health care treatment, payment, or operations under the federal Health 10Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996.SB166,3,1111(d) “Business associate” has the meaning given in 45 CFR 160.103.SB166,3,1212(e) “Child” means an individual younger than 13 years of age.SB166,3,1713(f) “Consent” means a clear affirmative act signifying a consumer’s freely 14given, specific, informed, and unambiguous agreement to process personal data 15relating to the consumer. “Consent” may include a written statement, including a 16statement written by electronic means, or any other unambiguous affirmative 17action. “Consent” does not include any of the following:SB166,3,20181. Acceptance of a general terms-of-use document or similar document that 19contains descriptions of personal data processing along with other, unrelated 20information.SB166,3,21212. Hovering over, muting, pausing, or closing a given piece of content.SB166,3,22223. Agreements obtained by using dark patterns.SB166,4,223(g) “Consumer” means an individual who is a resident of this state acting only 1in an individual or household context. “Consumer” does not include an individual 2acting in a commercial or employment context.SB166,4,43(h) “Controller” means a person that, alone or jointly with others, determines 4the purpose and means of processing personal data.SB166,4,55(i) “Covered entity” has the meaning given in 45 CFR 160.103.SB166,4,76(ja) “Cures Act” means the federal 21st Century Cures Act and valid federal 7regulations enacted pursuant to such provisions.SB166,4,108(jd) “Dark pattern” means a user interface designed or manipulated with the 9substantial effect of subverting or impairing user autonomy, decision making, or 10choice.SB166,4,1511(jg) “Decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects concerning a 12consumer” means a decision made by the controller that results in the provision or 13denial by the controller of financial and lending services, housing, insurance, 14education enrollment, criminal justice, employment opportunities, health care 15services, or access to basic necessities, such as food and water.SB166,4,1716(ka) “Deidentified data” means data that cannot reasonably be linked to an 17identified or identifiable individual, or a device linked to such person.SB166,4,2018(kb) “Identified or identifiable individual” means a person who can be readily 19identified, directly or indirectly, in particular by reference to an identifier such as a 20name, an identification number, specific geolocation data, or an online identifier.SB166,4,2321(La) “HIPAA” means the federal Health Insurance Portability and 22Accountability Act and valid federal regulations enacted pursuant to the act, 23including 45 CFR 164.500 to 164.534.SB166,5,31(Lg) “HITECH” means the federal Health Information Technology for 2Economic and Clinical Health Act and valid federal regulations enacted pursuant 3to the act.SB166,5,44(m) “Institution of higher education” has the meaning given in s. 39.32 (1) (a).SB166,5,75(n) “Nonprofit organization” means any corporation organized under ch. 181, 6any organization identified under s. 895.486 (2) (e), or any organization exempt 7from taxation under section 501 (c) (3), (6), or (12) of the Internal Revenue Code.SB166,5,108(o) “Personal data” means any information that is linked or reasonably 9linkable to an identified or identifiable individual. “Personal data” does not include 10deidentified data or publicly available information.SB166,5,1711(p) “Precise geolocation data” means information derived from technology, 12including global positioning system level latitude and longitude coordinates or other 13mechanisms, that directly identifies the specific location of an individual with 14precision and accuracy within a radius of 1,750 feet. “Precise geolocation data” 15does not include the content of communications or any data generated by or 16connected to advanced utility metering infrastructure systems or equipment for use 17by a utility.SB166,5,2118(q) “Process” or “processing” means any operation or set of operations 19performed, whether by manual or automated means, on personal data or on sets of 20personal data, such as the collection, use, storage, disclosure, analysis, deletion, or 21modification of personal data.SB166,5,2322(r) “Processor” means an individual or person that processes personal data on 23behalf of a controller.SB166,6,41(s) “Profiling” means any form of automated processing performed on 2personal data to evaluate, analyze, or predict personal aspects related to an 3identified or identifiable individual’s economic situation, health, personal 4preferences, interests, reliability, behavior, location, or movements.SB166,6,95(t) “Pseudonymous data” means personal data that cannot be attributed to a 6specific individual without the use of additional information, provided that such 7additional information is kept separately and is subject to appropriate technical 8and organizational measures to ensure that the personal data is not attributed to 9an identified or identifiable individual.SB166,6,1510(u) “Publicly available information” means information that is lawfully made 11available through federal, state, or local government records, or information that a 12business has a reasonable basis to believe is lawfully made available to the general 13public through widely distributed media, by the consumer, or by a person to whom 14the consumer has disclosed the information, unless the consumer has restricted the 15information to a specific audience.SB166,6,1816(v) “Sale of personal data” means the exchange of personal data for monetary 17or other valuable consideration by the controller to a 3rd party. “Sale of personal 18data” does not include any of the following:SB166,6,20191. The disclosure of personal data to a processor that processes the personal 20data on behalf of the controller.SB166,6,22212. The disclosure of personal data to a 3rd party for purposes of providing a 22product or service requested by the consumer.SB166,7,2233. The disclosure of personal data based on the consumer directing the 1controller to disclose the personal data or intentionally using the controller to 2interact with a 3rd party.SB166,7,334. The disclosure or transfer of personal data to an affiliate of the controller.SB166,7,645. The disclosure of information that a consumer intentionally made available 5to the general public via a channel of mass media and did not restrict to a specific 6audience.SB166,7,976. The disclosure or transfer of personal data to a 3rd party as an asset that is 8part of a merger, acquisition, bankruptcy, or other transaction in which the 3rd 9party assumes control of all or part of the controller’s assets.SB166,7,1010(w) “Sensitive data” includes the following: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb166 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb166 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB166 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB166 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB166: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting